Hawaii statutes.
§383-143 General penalty. Any person
who wilfully violates this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation
thereunder, the violation of which is made unlawful or the observance of which
is required under the terms of this chapter, and for which a penalty is neither
prescribed in this chapter nor provided by any other applicable statute, shall
be charged with a misdemeanor, and subject to a fine of not more than $10,000;
and each day the violation continues shall be deemed to be a separate offense.
[L 1939, c 219, §14(b)(5); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 36; RL 1945, §4290;
RL 1955, §93-142; HRS §383-143; am L 2005, c 114, §3]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next